Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-701
Telecommunications rights-of-way; definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 86-701 to 86-710, the definitions found in sections 86-702 and 86-703 apply.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 406.